District of Columbia statutes.
44-105.06

Privacy and confidentiality.

(a)

A resident shall have the right to the following:

(1)

To access their ALA and healthcare records on demand;

(2)

To have their records kept confidential and released only in accordance with their informed uncoerced consent in accordance with District and federal law;

(3)

To have their records maintained during their residency;

(4)

To have their records maintained for up to 3 years after discharge or death; and

(5)

To have any case discussion, consultation, examination, or treatment of the resident be kept confidential.

(b)

If, for any reason, a resident cannot act for him or herself, their consent shall be given on their behalf by their designated surrogate which consent shall also be uncoerced and informed.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 506, 47 DCR 2647